Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.340

Restrictions regarding promoting prostitution, commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or other commercial sex acts.

(1) No seller of travel shall engage in any of the following:

(a) Promoting travel for prostitution or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor;

(b) Selling, advertising, or otherwise offering to sell travel services or facilitate travel:

(i) For the purposes of engaging in a commercial sex act;

(ii) That consists of tourism packages or activities using and offering sexual acts as an enticement for tourism; or

(iii) That provides, purports to provide access to, or facilitates the availability of sex escorts or sexual services.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Commercial sex act" means any sexual contact, as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, for which anything of value is given to or received by any person.

(b) "Sexual act" means any sexual contact as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

[ 2007 c 368 s 6; 2006 c 250 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2006 c 250: See note following RCW 9A.88.085.